New York, session 2025-2026, S6076.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2500-n to read as follows: 3 § 2500-n. Sickle cell disease training. 1. Every medical student, 4 medical resident and physician assistant student in the state as part of 5 the curriculum provided by medical schools, medical residency programs 6 and physician assistant programs shall complete coursework or training, 7 approved by the department, regarding awareness and treatment of sickle 8 cell disease. 9 2. Every medical student, medical resident and physician assistant 10 student in the state shall provide to the department documentation 11 demonstrating the completion of and competence in the coursework or 12 training required pursuant to subdivision one of this section. 13 3. The department shall consult with the state board for medicine and 14 the health equity council in developing guidelines for the coursework or 15 training required pursuant to subdivision one of this section. 16 4. One year after the effective date of this section and annually 17 every year thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the 18 governor and the legislature on the implementation and effectiveness of 19 the coursework or training required pursuant to subdivision one of this 20 section. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 22 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 23 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 24 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 25 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10668-01-5